Idaho, session 2025, S1042.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
provide certain limitations on the charging of rental application fees to
reduce the number of rental applicants who are charged such fees for rental
properties for which they are not considered.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-315, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-315. LIMITATION ON FEES FOR RENTAL APPLICATIONS. (1) A property
owner or property manager shall not charge rental application fees to more
than two (2) rental applicant households per rental unit concurrently and
may charge such fees only if the property owner or property manager:
(a) Has a rental unit available for rent or has a rental unit that is
reasonably expected to become available for rent within sixty (60)
days, unless the property owner or property manager advertises that the
rental unit is reasonably expected to become available for rent at a
future date beyond sixty (60) days, or unless the rental applicant ac-
knowledges in writing that no rental property is available and consents
to being placed on a waiting list for future available rental units;
(b) Discloses, prior to accepting the rental application, any criteria
that the property owner or property manager will review as a condi-
tion of accepting the rental applicant as a tenant in the residential
unit, including, if applicable, information related to the rental
applicant's criminal history, credit score, income, employment or em-
ployment history, or rental history; and
(c) Completes the criminal history and background check of the ap-
plicant for the available rental unit, unless the rental applicant is
placed on a waiting list for future available rental units pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Rental application fees may only be charged to each legal adult
within a rental applicant household.
(3) If the rental application of the first of the two (2) rental ap-
plicant households pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is denied, a
property owner or property manager may charge a rental application fee to the
next rental applicant household and may charge a rental application fee to
each individual rental applicant of such household who requires a criminal


history and background check, as long as no more than two (2) rental appli-
cant households are being charged concurrently at any given time.
(4) All rental application fees shall be related to the actual costs of
completing a criminal history and background check and any other costs in-
curred from processing the rental application.
(5) This section shall not apply where a property owner or property man-
ager does not charge or receive rental application fees.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.